src/fst/stems/pron.lexc
LEXICON PRON_YKSI

:hde	PRON_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS ;

+Sg:hde	PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_N ;

:h	PRON_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ ;

:hte	PRON_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS ;

:hte	PRON_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;

+Sg:ksi	PRON_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ;

:ks	PRON_FRONT_PLURALS ;

:ks	PRON_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ ;

:ks	PRON_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN ;

:ks	PRON_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN ;

LEXICON PRONOUN
yksi+Pron:y  PRON_YKSI  ;
